North Carolina statutes. Chapter 23. Debtor and Creditor.
Article 1. Assignments for Benefit of Creditors. [Repealed]

§§ 23-1 through 23-12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021, and applicable to receiverships commenced on or after that date.

History.

G.S. 23-1

; 1893, c. 453; Rev., s. 967; 1909, c. 918, s. 1; C.S., s. 1609; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-2; 1893, c. 453, s. 2; Rev., s. 968; C.S., s. 1610; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-3; 1909, c. 918, s. 2; C.S., s. 1611; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-4; 1915, c. 176, s. 1; C.S., s. 1612; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-5; 1893, c. 453, s. 3; Rev., s. 969; C.S., s. 1613; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-6; 1909, c. 918, s. 3; C.S., s. 1614; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-7; 1893, c. 453, s. 3; Rev., s. 970; 1909, c. 918, s. 4; 1915, c. 176, s. 2; C.S., s. 1615; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-8; 1893, c. 453, s. 4; Rev., s. 971; C.S., s. 1616; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-9; 1893, c. 453, ss. 6, 7; Rev., ss. 972, 3617; C.S., s. 1617; 1993, c. 539, s. 397; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 34; c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021.

G.S. 23-1

0; 1909, c. 918, s. 5; C.S., s. 1618; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-11; 1893, c. 453, s. 5; Rev., s. 973; C.S., s. 1619; repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-12; 1893, c. 453, s. 8; Rev., s. 3689; C.S., s. 1620; 1993, c. 539, s. 398; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021.